Maryland, session 2026, HB0051.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
13–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Final disposition” includes an acquittal, dismissal, nolle prosequi, finding of
guilty, probation before judgment, plea of guilty or of nolo contendere, marking the charge
“stet” on the docket, and an order of an appellate court ending a criminal case.
(c) “Financial authority” means:
(1) if the seizing authority is the State, the State Treasurer;
(2) if the seizing authority is a unit of a county, the treasurer or director of
finance of that county; or
(3) if the seizing authority is a unit of a municipal corporation, the
treasurer or director of finance of that municipal corporation.
13–102.
(a) Money is prima facie contraband if a law enforcement officer in the State
seizes the money in connection with an arrest for:
(1) unlawfully playing or operating a bookmaking scheme;
(2) unlawfully betting on a horse race, athletic event, lottery, or game; or
(3) using an unlawful gaming table or gaming device.
(b) (1) For purposes of this subsection, the Police Department of Baltimore
City is not a State authority.
(2) All rights in, title to, and interest in money seized under subsection (a)
of this section shall immediately vest in and to:

HOUSE BILL 51 3
(i) the county or the municipal corporation, if the money is seized by
the police of the local government, including a sheriff’s department that is the local law
enforcement unit; or
(ii) the State, if the money is seized by a State authority.
13–104.
(A) [Pending] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, PENDING A
final disposition, the financial authority shall account for and deposit seized money in an
interest–bearing bank account or invest the seized money in accordance with Title 17 of the
Local Government Article.
(B) IF THE SEIZING AUTHORITY IS THE STATE, THE STATE TREASURER
SHALL:
(1) DEPOSIT SEIZED MONEY INTO THE MARYLAND DIGITAL ASSET
RESERVE FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–332 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE; AND
(2) RETAIN IN THE MARYLAND DIGITAL ASSET RESERVE FUND ANY
SEIZED MONEY THAT IS FORFEITED TO THE STATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SUBTITLE.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND

HOUSE BILL 51
214. THE MARYLAND DIGITAL ASSET RESERVE FUND.
7–332.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CRYPTOCURRENCY” MEANS A DECENTRALIZED DIGITAL ASSET
THAT UTILIZES A BLOCKCHAIN LEDGER THAT:
(I) IS SECURED BY CRYPTOGRAPHIC TECHNOLOGY; AND
(II) HAS A MARKET CAPITALIZATION OF NOT LESS THAN
$500,000,000,000.
(3) “FUND” MEANS THE MARYLAND DIGITAL ASSET RESERVE FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) THERE IS A MARYLAND DIGITAL ASSET RESERVE FUND.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO:
(I) RETAIN MONEY SEIZED AND FORFEITED TO THE STATE
UNDER § 13–104 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE; AND
(II) SERVE AS A RESERVE ASSET FOR THE STATE THROUGH
INVESTMENT IN CRYPTOCURRENCY.
(3) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(4) (I) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(II) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION, THE STATE
TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY, AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL
ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(C) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 13–104 OF THE
CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;

HOUSE BILL 51 5
(3) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(4) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(D) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY TO INVEST IN CRYPTOCURRENCY.
(E) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(F) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(G) CRYPTOCURRENCY ACQUIRED AS AN INVESTMENT UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL BE HELD BY:
(1) THE STATE TREASURER THROUGH A SECURE PLATFORM THAT IS
SPECIFICALLY CREATED TO STORE, MANAGE, AND SAFEGUARD DIGITAL ASSETS FOR
INSTITUTIONS; OR
(2) A QUALIFIED CUSTODIAN AS DETERMINED BY THE STATE
TREASURER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.